en: Red endive
it: indivia rossa

en: Green endive
it: indivia verde

en: dock
la: Rumex

en: fiddlehead fern
la: Matteuccia struthiopteris

en: firewood leaf, firewoord leaves
la: Chamaenerion angustifolium, Epilobium angustifolium

en: radicchio
ar: الهندباء
bg: червена цикория, радичио
ca: radicchio
da: radicchio, radicchiosalat
de: roter Chicorée, Radicchio
eo: salatcikorio
es: radicchio
fi: punasikuri, punasalaatti
fr: chicorée rouge, radicchio, trévise, salade trévise
hr: radič
hu: vörös cikória
it: radicchio, radicchio rosso
ja: ラディッキオ
ko: 라디키오
nl: roodlof
pl: cykoria sałatowa, czerwona cykoria, radicchio, cykoria radicchio
pt: radicchio
ru: радиккьо
sh: radiccio di treviso
sv: radicchiosallad, rosensallat, rosésallat

en: curly endive, frisée lettuce
cy: ysgellog y meirch
da: kruset endivie
de: krauser Salat, Endiven gekraust, Krausblättrige Endivie, Frisée
el: αντίδι κατσαρό
es: escarola rizada
fi: friseesalaatti, kähäräendiivi
fr: chicorée frisée, frisée, salade frisée, endive frisée
ga: searbhán cas
hr: kovrčava endivija
it: indivia riccia
la: Cichorium endivia var. crispum
lv: krokainā endīvija, krokaino lapu endīvija
nl: krulandijvie, frisée sla
pl: endywia kędzierzawa, endywia frisee
pt: chicória frisada, chicória crespa
sk: čakanka štrbáková pravá kučeravá
sv: frisésallat, friséesallat

en: broad-leaved endive, Batavian endive, escarole, flat endive
da: bredbladet endivie, escarole, escarolesalat
de: glatte Endivie, Eskariol, Winterendivie, Endivie-Eskariol, Eskariol Endivie, Breitblättrige Endivie, Ganzblättrige Endivie
el: αντίδι πλατύφυλλο
es: escarola lisa
fi: siloendiivi, lehtisikuri
fr: chicorée scarole
hr: širokolisna endivija
it: indivia scarola
la: Cichorium endivia var latifolium
lt: salotinė trūkažolė
lv: platlapu endīvija
mt: indivja tal-weraq wiesa'
nl: kropandijvie, andijvie breedblad
pl: endywia szerokolistna, endywia escarola
sv: escarolesallat

en: lettuce, Lettuces
af: Blaarslaai
am: ሰላጣ
an: Ensalada
ar: خس
az: Süddəyən, Kahı
ba: Латук
be: Латук
bg: Маруля
bn: লেটুস
bo: རྗེན་ཚལ་
ca: Lletuga, enciam
cs: locika, locika setá
cy: Letysen
de: Lattich, Gartensalat, Kopfsalat
eo: Laktuko, Kultiva laktuko
es: Lechuga, Lechugas, Lechuga roja, Lechuga de hoja roja
et: Salat, Aedsalat
eu: Uraza
fa: لاکتوکا, کاهو
fi: lehtisalaatti
fr: laitue, Laitues
ga: Leitís
gl: Leituga
gu: Ka'anakyrỹi
gv: Glassyr
he: חסה, חסה תרבותית
hr: zelena salata
ht: Leti
hu: kerti saláta
hy: հազար
id: Selada
io: Latugo
is: Salat
it: Lattuga
ja: アキノノゲシ属, レタス
ka: ღორისქადა, სალათა
kk: Ассүттіген, Салат
kn: ಲೆಟಿಸ್
ko: 왕고들빼기속, 상추
ku: Kahû
ky: Сүттикен
la: Lactuca, Lactuca sativa
lt: Salota, Sėjamoji salota
lv: salātlapas, Dārza salāti
mk: Зелена салата
ml: ഉർവച്ചീര
ms: Salad
my: ဆလတ်ပင်
nb: Salater
nl: sla
nn: hagesalat, Planteslekta salat
os: Къæсула
pa: ਸਲਾਦ
pl: sałata, sałaty, sałat
pt: alface
qu: Pilliyuyu
ro: salată
ru: Салат, Латук
rw: Imboga za leti
sc: Lattuca
sh: Zelena salata
si: සලාද
sr: зелена салата
sv: Sallat, Sallatsläktet
ta: இலைக்கோசு
th: สกุลผักกาดหอม, ผักกาดหอม
tl: Letsugas
to: Lētisilau
tr: Marul
ug: ظوسذث
uk: Латук, Салат
uz: Salat
vi: Chi Rau diếp, Xà lách
wa: Salåde
za: byaekaengjgwx
zh: 莴苣属, 萵苣

en: romaine lettuce, cos
ar: خس روماني
bn: রোমাইন লেটুস
ca: enciam llarg
cs: římský salát
da: romainesalat, romersk salat, bindsalat
de: Römersalat, römischer Salat, Bindesalat, Romanasalat
el: θρίδαξ ο μακρόφυλλος ο ρωμαϊκός
eo: roma laktuko
es: lechuga romana, lechuga larga, lechugon
et: rooma salat
fa: کاهوی رومی
fi: roomansalaatti, sidesalaatti
fr: laitue romaine
ga: cósleitís
he: חסה עלים
hi: रोमेन सलाद
hr: salata kristalka
it: lattuga romana
ja: ロメインレタス
ko: 로메인상추
la: Lactuca sativa var. longifolia
lv: romiešu salāti
ml: റൊമെയ്ൻ ലെറ്റ്യൂസ്
nb: romanosalat
nl: bindsla, romeinse sla, romaine
pa: ਰੋਮੇਨ ਸਲਾਦ
pl: sałata rzymska, sałaty rzymskiej
pt: alface romana
ro: salată romană
ru: римский салат
sl: solata vezivka
sv: romansallat
tl: letsugas romana
vi: rau diếp
zh: 蘿蔓萵苣

en: iceberg lettuce
bg: салата айсберг
ca: enciam iceberg
da: icebergsalat, iceberg-salat
de: Eisbergsalat
eo: glacilaktuko
es: lechuga iceberg, iceberg
fi: jäävuorisalaatti
fr: laitue iceberg, iceberg
hr: ledena salata
hu: jégsaláta
it: insalata iceberg, lattuga iceberg
la: Lactuca sativa var. capitata
nb: isbergsalat
nl: ijsbergsla
pl: sałata lodowa, sałaty lodowej
pt: alface americana
sv: isbergssallad, isbergssallat

en: frillice iceberg lettuce, frillice lettuce
sv: krispsallad, kripsallad

en: green frillice iceberg lettuce
sv: grön krispsallad

en: red leaf lettuce
it: lattuga rossa
ja: サニーレタス, アカチリメンチシャ, 赤チリメンチシャ
sv: rödbladig sallad

en: corn salad, common cornsalad, lamb's lettuce, fetticus, nut lettuce, field salad, rapunzel, doucette, raiponce, Nusslisalat
ar: خس النعجة
be: валер’янэла малая
ca: canonges, herba dels canonges
cs: polníček, kozlíček polní
cy: gwylaeth yr oen
da: vårsalat, feldsalat
de: Feldsalat, Rapunzel, Rapunzelsalat, Nüsslisalat
el: λυκοτρίβολο
es: milamores, canonigos
et: põldkännak
eu: ardi-mihi
fi: vuonankaali
fr: mâche, rampon
ga: ceathrú uain
gl: herba dos cóengos
hr: matovilac
hu: salátagalambbegy, galambbegy, madársaláta, mezeisaláta
io: valerianelo
is: akursalat
it: songino, nusslisalat, lattughella, dolcetta, morbidello, Formentino, Valerianella, Serzetto
ja: ノヂシャ
ko: 콘샐러드
la: valerianella locusta
nb: vårsalat
nl: veldsla
oc: doceta
pl: rapunkuł, roszpunka warzywna, roszponka, roszponki
pt: canónigos, alface-de-cordeiro
ro: fetică
ru: полевой салат, Валерянелла, Валерьяница
sk: valeriánka poľná
sl: navadni motovilec
sr: матовилац, matilovac
sv: vårklynne, fältsallat, vintersallat
tr: kuzugevreği
uk: мласкавець салатний
wa: doûcete
zh: 萵苣纈草

en: chard, Chards, Swiss chard, silver beet, seakale beet, leaf beet
ar: سلق
bg: Манголд
bs: Blitva
ca: bleda
co: Geia
cs: Mangold
da: bladbede, sølvbede, mangold
de: Mangold
el: Σέσκουλο
eo: Folibeto
es: Acelgas
eu: Zerba
fa: برگ چغندر
fi: mangoldi, lehtimangoldi, lehtijuurikas
fr: blette, Blettes, bette, bettes, côtes de blettes
ga: Biatas bán
gl: Acelga
he: סלק עלים
hr: blitva
hu: Mángold
it: Bietola, bietole
ja: フダンソウ
kk: Жапырақты қызылша
ko: 근대
ku: Dîw
la: Beta vulgaris var. cicla
mk: Блитва
nb: bladbete
nl: snijbiet
nn: mangold
pl: boćwina, botwina, botwiny, boćwiny
pt: acelga
ro: Mangold
ru: мангольд
sr: блитва
sv: mangold
tr: Pazı
uk: Мангольд
zh: 莙薘菜

en: chard concentrate
de: Rübenkonzentrat
fr: concentrés de blettes
hr: koncentrat blitve
it: concentrato di bietola

en: red chard
sv: röd mangold

en: mustard spinach, komatsuna
la: Brassica rapa var. perviridis

en: new zealand spinach
la: Tetragonia tetragonioides